Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.010

Who may prosecute writ.

Every person restrained of his or her liberty under any pretense whatever, may prosecute a writ of habeas corpus to inquire into the cause of the restraint, and shall be delivered therefrom when illegal.

[ 2011 c 336 s 185; Code 1881 s 666; 1877 p 138 s 669; 1869 p 156 s 606; 1854 p 212 s 434; RRS s 1063.]